Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB774.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 328(a) introductory paragraph and (b) introductory paragraph of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 328. School Director Training Programs.--(a) [Beginning in] For the 2018-2019 school year [and in each school year thereafter] through the 2025-2026 school year, the following shall apply:* * *(a.1) For the 2026-2027 school year and in each school year thereafter, the following shall apply:(1) Each newly elected or appointed school director shall 1234567891011121314151617181920 complete, during the first year of the school director's first term, a training program made available by the Department of Education, in consultation with a Statewide organization representing school directors and a Statewide organization representing school business officials, pertaining to the skills and knowledge necessary to serve as a school director. The training program shall consist of a minimum of fourteen (14) hours of instruction, which may be determined by the Department of Education, and shall include, at a minimum, information regarding the following:(i) Instruction and academic programs.(ii) Best practices related to trauma-informed approaches, which shall comprise a minimum of one (1) hour of instruction.(iii) Personnel.(iv) Fiscal management.(v) Operations.(vi) Governance.(vii) Ethics and open meetings, to include the requirements under 65 Pa.C.S. Pt. II.(2) Except as provided under paragraph (1), each year each school director shall complete an advanced training program made available by the Department of Education in consultation with a Statewide organization representing school directors and a Statewide organization representing school business officials. The advanced training program shall consist of a minimum of four (4) hours of instruction, including information on relevant changes to information covered in the initial training course, such as Federal and State public school law and regulations, fiscal management, trauma-informed approaches and other information deemed appropriate by the Department of Education to 20250HB0774PN0796 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enable the school director to serve effectively. If there are no changes to the information covered in the initial training course, instruction may include other professional development activities as determined by the Department of Education. School districts may make recommendations on instructional content.(3) The training programs required under this subsection shall be made available by the Department of Education at no cost to school districts or school directors. The Department of Education shall approve alternative training programs that fulfill the requirements of this subsection which may be provided by school districts, intermediate units, postsecondary institutions or Statewide education organizations. The Department of Education shall post on its publicly accessible Internet website all alternative training programs approved under this paragraph.(4) This subsection shall apply to members of a School Reform Commission established under section 696, provided that the training programs provided to members of a School Reform Commission shall include information regarding sections 693 and 696 and other information deemed appropriate to enable a member of a School Reform Commission to serve effectively.(b) [Beginning in] For the 2018-2019 school year[, and in each school year thereafter] through the 2025-2026 school year, the following shall apply:* * *(b.1) For the 2026-2027 school year and in each school year thereafter, the following shall apply:(1) Each newly appointed trustee of a charter school entity shall complete, within the trustee's first year of service, a training program made available by the Department of Education, 20250HB0774PN0796 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in consultation with Statewide organizations representing charter school entities, pertaining to the skills and knowledge necessary to serve as a charter school entity trustee. The training program shall consist of a minimum of fourteen (14) hours of instruction, which may be determined by the Department of Education, and shall include, at a minimum, the information listed in subsection (a.1)(1) and information concerning Article XVII-A.(2) Except as provided under paragraph (1), each year each trustee shall complete an advanced training program made available by the Department of Education in consultation with Statewide organizations representing charter school entities. The advanced training program shall consist of a minimum of four (4) hours of instruction, including information on relevant changes to information covered in the initial training course, such as Federal and State public school law and regulations, including Article XVII-A, fiscal management, trauma-informed approaches and other information deemed appropriate by the Department of Education to enable the trustee to serve effectively. If there are no changes to the information covered in the initial training course, instruction may include other professional development activities as determined by the Department of Education. Charter school entities may make recommendations on instructional content.(3) The training programs required under this subsection shall be made available by the Department of Education at no cost to charter school entities or charter school entity trustees. The Department of Education shall approve alternative training programs that fulfill the requirements of this subsection which may be provided by charter school entities, 20250HB0774PN0796 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school districts, intermediate units, postsecondary institutions, Statewide organizations representing charter school entities or other Statewide education organizations. The Department of Education shall post on its publicly accessible Internet website all alternative training programs approved under this paragraph.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0774PN0796 - 5 - 12345678